en: blond psyllium husk
es: tegumento de psyllium rubio
fr: tégument de psyllium blond
hr: plava ljuska psiliuma
it: buccia di psillio biondo
pl: łupina nasienna babki jajowatej, łupiny nasion babki jajowatej, łuska babki jajowatej

en: blond psyllium fibre
it: fibra di psillio biondo
pl: błonnik babki jajowatej, błonnik z babki jajowatej, błonnik z łuski babki jajowatej

en: honey
ab: ацха
af: Heuning
ak: 3wu)
am: ማር
an: Miel
ar: عسل النحل
ay: Misk'i
az: Bal
ba: Бал
be: мёд
bn: মধু
br: Mel
bs: Med
ca: mel
co: mele
cs: med
cu: мєдъ
cv: Пыл
cy: Mêl
da: honning
de: Honig
dv: މާމުއި
ee: Anyitsi
el: μέλι
eo: mielo
es: miel, miel de azahar, miel de abeja, miel de abejas
et: mesi
eu: Ezti
fa: عسل
fi: hunaja
fo: hunangur
fr: miel
fy: huning
ga: Mil
gd: Mil
gl: Mel
gn: Eirete
gu: મધુ
gv: mill
he: דבש
hi: मधु
hr: med
ht: Siwo
hu: méz
hy: Մեղր
ia: melle
id: Madu
io: Mielo
is: Hunang
it: miele
iu: missuuttagaq
ja: 蜂蜜, はちみつ, ハチミツ
jv: Madu
ka: თაფლი
kk: Ара балы
km: ទឹកឃ្មុំ
kn: ಜೇನು
ko: 벌꿀
ku: Hingiv
kw: mel
ky: Бал
la: Mel
lb: Hunneg
li: honing
ln: Mafúta ma nzói
lo: ມະທຸ
lt: Medus
lv: medus
mk: Мед
ml: തേൻ
mn: Зөгийн бал
mr: मध
ms: madu
mt: għasel
my: ပျားရည်
nb: honning
ne: मह
nl: honing
nn: honning
nv: Tsísʼná bitłʼizh
oc: Mèl
om: Damma
or: ମହୁ
os: муд
pa: ਸ਼ਹਿਦ
pl: miód, miodu, miody, miodowy, miodowa, miodowe
ps: گبين
pt: mel
qu: Lachiwa misk'i
rm: mel
ro: miere
ru: пчелиный мёд, мед, мёд, мёд натуральный, мед натуральный
rw: Ubuki
sa: मधु
sc: Meli
sd: ماکي
se: miehta
sh: Med
si: මී පැණි
sk: med
sl: med
sn: Huchi
so: Malab
sq: mjalti
sr: мед
su: Madu
sv: honung
sw: Asali
ta: தேன்
te: తేనె
tg: Асал
th: น้ำผึ้ง
tk: bal
tl: Pulot-pukyutan
tr: Bal
tt: Бал
ug: ھەسەل
uk: мед
ur: شہد
uz: Asal
vi: Mật ong
vo: miel
wa: Låme
wo: lem
yi: האניג
zh: 蜂蜜

en: bee honey
bg: пчелен мед
de: Bienenhonig
hr: pčelinji med
it: miele d'api
pl: miód pszczeli

en: organic honey
bg: био мед
de: Bio-Honig
es: miel orgánica
fi: luomuhunaja, luomu hunaja
fr: miel bio, miel biologique, miel issu de l'agriculture biologique
hr: organski med
it: miele biologico
nl: biologische honing

en: liquid honey
de: flüssiger Honig, Flüssighonig
fr: miel-liquide
hr: tekući med
it: miele liquido
nl: vloeibare honing

en: creamy honey, Creamy nectar honey, Honey with creamy flowers
de: Honig cremig
fr: miel crémeux, miel de nectar crémeux, miel de fleurs crémeux
hr: kremasti med
it: miele cremoso

en: flower honey
da: blomsterhonning
de: Blütenhonig
es: miel de flores
fi: kukkahunaja
fr: miel de fleurs, miel de nectar
hr: med cvjetni, cvjetni med
it: miele di fiori
nl: bloemenhoning, bloemen-honing
pl: miód kwiatowy

fr: miel toutes fleurs
de: Mischblütenhonig
es: miel mil flores
it: miele millefiori
pl: miód wielokwiatowy, miód nektarowy wielokwiatowy

en: organic mixed flower honey
fr: miel biologique toutes fleurs
it: miele biologico di millefiori

en: wildflower honey, wild flower honey
de: Wildblütenhonig
fi: villikukkahunaja
fr: miel de fleurs sauvages
hr: med od divljeg cvijeća
it: miele di fiori selvatici
nl: wilde bloemen honing

en: acacia honey
bg: мед от акация
de: Akazienhonig
es: Miel de acacia
fi: akaasiahunaja
fr: miel d'acacia, miel de acacia
hr: bagremov med
it: miele d'acacia
nl: acaciahoning

en: acacia honey from France
de: Akazienhonig aus Frankreich
fr: miel d'acacia de france, miel d'acacia récolté en France, Miel d'acacia de Bourgogne, miel d'acacia du val de saone, miel d'acacia d'occitanie
hr: bagremov med iz Francuske
it: miele di acacia proveniente dalla Francia
nl: Acaciahoning uit Frankrijk

en: buckwheat honey
it: miele di grano saraceno
pl: miód gryczany, miód nektarowy gryczany

fr: miel de bruyere
nl: heidehoning

fr: miel de bruyere blanche
nl: witte heidehoning

fr: miel de châtaignier, miel de chataigner, miel de fleurs de chataignier
de: Kastanienhonig
it: miele di castagno
nl: kastanjehoning

en: eucalyptus honey
de: Eukalyptushonig
fi: eukalyptushunaja
fr: miel d'eucalyptus
hr: med od eukaliptusa
it: miele di eucalipto
nl: eucalyptushoning

en: lavander honey
de: Lavendelhonig, Lavendelhonige
es: miel de lavanda
fi: laventelihunaja
fr: miel de lavande, Miels de lavande, miel de lavande maritime, miel de nectar de fleurs de lavande
hr: med od lavande
it: miele di lavanda
nl: Lavandelhoning, Lavendelhoningen

en: lavander honey from the Provence
de: Lavendelhonig aus der Provence
fr: Miel de lavande de Provence
hr: med od lavande iz Provanse
it: miele di lavanda della Provenza
nl: lavendelhoning uit de Provence